Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 16

Examination and Reports

45-2-1601. Supervision of banks.

Every person doing a banking business under the laws of this state shall be subject to supervision and regulation by the commissioner.

In addition to other powers conferred by chapters 1-9 of this title, the commissioner has the power to require banks subject to the commissioner's supervision to:

Maintain their accounts and to value their assets in accordance with generally accepted principles of accounting;

Charge off the whole or part of an asset that at the time of its acquisition could not lawfully have been acquired and that could not lawfully be retained at the time of the commissioner's action; provided, that the commissioner's action is within two (2) years of the aforementioned acquisition;

Record liens and security in property or, at the option of the bank, insure against losses from not recording;

Obtain a financial statement from a borrower to the extent that the bank can do so;

Search, or obtain insurance of, the title to real estate taken as security; and

Maintain adequate insurance against the risks that the commissioner determines are necessary and appropriate for the protection of depositors.

No person shall be subjected to any civil or criminal liability for any act or omission to act in good faith in reliance upon a subsisting order, regulation or interpretation of the commissioner, notwithstanding a subsequent decision by a court invalidating the order, regulation or interpretation.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (2.201); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-701.

Cross-References. Negotiable instruments, title 47, ch. 3.

45-2-1602. Examination of banks.

The commissioner shall, either personally or by competent examiner appointed by the commissioner, visit and examine every bank subject to the commissioner's supervision at least once in each year. The commissioner has discretion to determine the scope of the examination; provided, that a full-scope examination, as set out in subsection (b), shall be conducted by the commissioner or the commissioner's designee at least once in every three (3) years. The commissioner has discretion to accept, in any calendar year, all or part of an examination report of a federal banking regulatory agency conducted of a state bank in that year.

The provision of subdivision (a)(1) requiring an examination at least once in each year may be extended to eighteen (18) months; provided, that the bank meets the criteria applicable to the examination cycle imposed on federally insured depository institutions in Section 10(d) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. § 1820(d)).

The commissioner shall examine a state trust company at least once in an eighteen-month period, except that the commissioner may extend this examination cycle up to an additional eighteen (18) months. In making this determination, the commissioner may consider the state trust company's quality of management, capitalization, risk profile and any other factors the commissioner deems relevant. In no event may a state trust company's examination cycle be extended if the company did not receive a composite rating of one (1) or two (2) at its last examination.

On every examination, inquiry shall be made as to the condition and resources of the bank, the mode of conducting and managing the affairs of the bank, the action of its directors, the investment of the funds of the bank, the safety and prudence of the management of the bank, and whether the requirements of its charter and law have been complied with in the administration of the affairs of the bank, and as to any matters that the commissioner uniformly prescribes.

In addition, the commissioner has the power, and it is the commissioner's duty in like manner, to examine or cause to be examined into the affairs of every bank whenever, in the judgment of the commissioner, the management and condition of the bank are such as to render an examination of its affairs necessary or expedient, or whenever, in the opinion of the commissioner, the interest of the public demands an examination.

The commissioner also has the power to examine, or cause to be examined, every agency located in this state of any foreign bank or banking corporation, in the manner and for the same purpose that the commissioner shall examine domestic banks.

The commissioner also has the power to examine or cause to be examined subsidiary corporations of banks subject to the commissioner's supervision.

The commissioner, and every examiner acting under or appointed by the commissioner, has the power and authority to administer oaths and to examine under oath any person whose testimony may be required on the examination of any bank, or on the examination of any agency of any foreign bank or banking corporation, or on examination of any subsidiary of any bank subject to the commissioner's supervision, and has the authority and power to compel the appearance and attendance of the person for the purpose of the examination.

Any stockholder in any incorporated bank, any corporation doing a banking business, or any person interested in a firm or individual bank may call upon the commissioner, at any time, to make an examination of the bank in which the stockholder, corporation or person is interested, which examination the commissioner, either in person or by an examiner, may or may not make, in the exercise of discretion, upon the one making the request depositing with the commissioner in advance a sum sufficient to cover the cost of the examination.

Each examiner shall act under the direction of the commissioner, and shall forthwith examine fully into the books, papers, and affairs of the bank that the examiner may be directed by the commissioner to examine.

The commissioner shall furnish to each examiner a commission under the signature of the commissioner and official seal of the department, which commission the examiner shall exhibit to the officer or officers of the bank proposed to be examined as the examiner's authority for making the examination.

Each examiner shall report on oath to the commissioner the result of each examination made by the examiner, which report the commissioner shall keep on file in the commissioner's office; and when the commissioner in person makes an examination of the affairs of any bank, the commissioner shall in like manner make out a report under oath of the result of the examination, and the same shall be kept on file in the office of the commissioner, and a duplicate copy furnished the bank examined.

In the discretion of the commissioner, a state bank may be notified in advance that an examination is about to commence in order to afford the bank an opportunity to prepare reports or other information requested by the commissioner. In the discretion of the commissioner, a state bank may be examined at any time without prior notice to the bank.

The commissioner has the power to review the operations of any location engaging in activities as principal or on behalf of a state or out-of-state trust institution or any other company to determine if the location is engaging in unauthorized trust activity.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (2.202); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; 1978, ch. 563, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 45-702; Acts 1980, ch. 540, § 1; 1987, ch. 165, § 1; 1993, ch. 31, § 1; 1996, ch. 768, § 25; 1997, ch. 9, § 1; 1999, ch. 112, § 16; 2014, ch. 642, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1996, ch. 768, which amended this section, is known and may be cited as the Bank Reform Act of 1996.

For the Preamble to the act concerning the market for trust and trust services, please refer to Acts 2014, ch. 642.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, § 55.

Law Reviews.

Local Government Law (Clyde L. Ball), 6 Vand. L. Rev. 1206.

45-2-1603. Confidentiality, disclosure and reproduction of information.

The information obtained by the commissioner, or any bank examiner in making an examination into the affairs of the bank, shall be for the purpose of ascertaining the true condition of the affairs of the bank, shall be privileged and confidential, shall not be subject to subpoena, and shall not be disclosed by the party making the examination to any person, except that the examiner shall report the condition of the affairs of the bank to the commissioner, and except that the commissioner is authorized to make the following disclosures from reports of examination:

Within the department in the course of official duties;

To the federal deposit insurance corporation as provided in § 45-2-804 and to the federal reserve board, or its duly authorized representative, as provided in § 45-2-505;

To the federal reserve board, or its duly authorized representative, in the case of an application to form a bank holding company if the principal affiliate bank to be acquired is a state bank or to the federal reserve board in any other circumstance when the commissioner believes that disclosure is in the interest of sound banking regulation;

To the United States comptroller of the currency, or the comptroller's duly authorized representative, in the case of an application of a state bank for conversion to a national charter or to the comptroller in any other circumstance when the commissioner believes that disclosure is in the interest of sound banking regulation;

To the United States department of justice, federal bureau of investigation, state district attorneys general, Tennessee bureau of investigation or the attorney general and reporter in the case of any suspected criminal violations discovered during the course of an examination;

In any administrative proceeding or court action filed by the commissioner or the department to which the commissioner is an actual party;

To the directors of a state bank as provided in § 45-2-1602;

The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee for the purpose of an audit of the department of financial institutions;

The state treasurer and commissioner of finance and administration pursuant to § 9-4-402;

To other state financial institutions regulatory agencies;

To the federal consumer financial protection bureau, federal trade commission, United States department of labor and the securities and exchange commission, or their duly authorized representative, when the commissioner believes that disclosure is in the best interest of sound banking regulation;

The department of commerce and insurance; and

The United States department of justice, federal bureau of investigation, state district attorneys general, Tennessee bureau of investigation, state attorney general and reporter, internal revenue service, Tennessee office of homeland security, United States department of the treasury and the financial crimes enforcement network for purposes of information sharing to promote enforcement of and compliance with the Bank Secrecy Act (12 U.S.C. § 1829b, 12 U.S.C. §§ 1951-1959, and 31 U.S.C. §§ 5311-5332).

Disclosures made under subsection (a) shall be made under safeguards designed to prevent further dissemination of confidential information. If any agency or department that has received confidential information under subsection (a) receives a valid subpoena to produce documents of the department of financial institutions or desires to use the documents in litigation, including, but not limited to, discovery proceedings, in which it is involved, the agency or department shall notify the department of financial institutions for permission to produce the documents. The commissioner may, in the commissioner's discretion, authorize the requesting agency or department to use the documents under a protective order approved by the commissioner and designed to prevent the unnecessary further dissemination of the documents.

A bank may reproduce all or any part of a report of examination and send or deliver the reproduction to a bank holding company of which it is a subsidiary, and may also send or deliver the reproduced information to the bank's consultants, external auditors and legal counsel. The disclosure shall not affect the confidential nature of the disclosed information.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Bank holding company” has the same meaning as in § 45-2-1402; and

“Subsidiary,” with respect to a specified bank holding company, means:

Any company, twenty-five percent (25%) or more of whose voting shares, excluding shares owned by the United States or by any company wholly owned by the United States, is directly or indirectly owned or controlled by the bank holding company, or is held by it with power to vote;

Any company in which the election of a majority of whose directors is controlled in any manner by the bank holding company; or

Any company with respect to the management or policies of which the bank holding company has the power, directly or indirectly, to exercise a controlling influence, as determined by the commissioner, after notice and opportunity for hearing.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, the commissioner may, in the commissioner's discretion and in the interest of justice, and when under a validly issued subpoena, waive the privilege created herein and produce bank examination reports and other related documents under a protective order entered by a court or administrative tribunal of competent jurisdiction where the order is designed to protect the confidential nature of the information so disclosed from public dissemination.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, confidential information regarding insurance, securities and investment functions of financial institutions, and known or suspected violations of the insurance, banking or securities laws, may be shared among the departments of financial institutions and commerce and insurance, the district attorneys general for the respective counties, the Tennessee bureau of investigation and the attorney general and reporter. Information disclosed by the commissioner under this section shall not become matters of public record by virtue of the disclosure absent a waiver by the commissioner, or a protective order as provided for in this section.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the commissioner may, in the commissioner's discretion and in the interest of sound banking regulation, publicly disclose any written agreement jointly issued to a bank by the commissioner and the federal deposit insurance corporation, the federal reserve board, or the federal reserve board's duly authorized representative.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (2.203); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-703; Acts 1980, ch. 642, § 1; 1983, ch. 58, § 1; 1985, ch. 176, § 1; 1986, ch. 556, § 1; 1989, ch. 29, §§ 1-4; 1991, ch. 235, §§ 1-3; 1993, ch. 205, § 1; 2001, ch. 54, §§ 25-29; 2006, ch. 596, § 1; 2007, ch. 29, §§ 2, 3; 2013, ch. 36, §§ 1, 2; 2020, ch. 581, § 1.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment added (g).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 581, § 4. March 19, 2020.

Cross-References. Confidential records, §10-7-504.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 27.78.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, § 55.

Tennessee Law of Evidence (2nd ed., Cohen, Paine and Sheppeard), § 501.21.

45-2-1604. Reports by banks.

All banks shall make to the commissioner, on the call of the commissioner for the reports, at least two (2) reports during each year according to the form, including electronic transmission, that may be prescribed by the commissioner. The report must be verified by the oath or affirmation of the executive officers or agents thereof, and in the case of a corporation, by the president or cashier or secretary, and must be attested by the signature of at least three (3) directors of the corporation. The commissioner shall make one (1) of the calls in the first one-half (½) of the year and another in the latter one-half (½) of the year.

Each report shall exhibit in detail and under appropriate heads the resources and liabilities of each bank at the close of business on any past day specified by the commissioner. The day for reports shall be uniform throughout the state, and shall be transmitted by the bank to the commissioner within the period the commissioner prescribes, but in no instance less than five (5) days after receipt of a request or requisition thereof from the commissioner. Instead of the report required under this subsection (b), the commissioner may accept a copy of a call report required by federal regulatory agencies or deems the filing of the report, electronic or otherwise, as required by federal regulatory agencies to constitute compliance with this section.

The commissioner may call for a special report from any particular bank whenever, in the commissioner's judgment, the same is necessary or deemed necessary for the protection of the public or for a full and complete knowledge of the condition of the bank by the commissioner. Special reports called for shall be made in all particulars as required in subsections (a) and (b); provided, that a bank is not required to publish a copy of a special report in a newspaper.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (2.204); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; 1977, ch. 56, § 1; T.C.A., § 45-704; Acts 1996, ch. 768, § 26; 2001, ch. 54, § 30; 2004, ch. 455, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1996, ch. 768, that amended this section, is known and may be cited as the Bank Reform Act of 1996.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, § 55.